Illinois, session 104th, HB2534.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Genetic Information Privacy Act is amended 5by changing Section 20 as follows: 6    (410 ILCS 513/20)7    Sec. 20. Use of genetic testing information for insurance 8purposes. 9    (a) An insurer may not seek information derived from 10genetic testing for use in connection with a policy of 11accident and health insurance or life insurance. Except as 12provided in subsection (c), an insurer that receives 13information derived from genetic testing, regardless of the 14source of that information, may not use the information for a 15nontherapeutic purpose as it relates to a policy of accident 16and health insurance.17    (b) An insurer shall not use or disclose protected health 18information that is genetic information for underwriting 19purposes. For purposes of this Section, "underwriting 20purposes" means, with respect to an insurer: 21        (1) rules for, or determination of, eligibility 22    (including enrollment and continued eligibility) for, or 23    determination of, benefits under the plan, coverage, or   HB2534- 2 -LRB104 08539 BAB 18591 b1    policy (including changes in deductibles or other 2    cost-sharing mechanisms in return for activities such as 3    completing a health risk assessment or participating in a 4    wellness program);5        (2) the computation of premium or contribution amounts 6    under the plan, coverage, or policy (including discounts, 7    rebates, payments in kind, or other premium differential 8    mechanisms in return for activities, such as completing a 9    health risk assessment or participating in a wellness 10    program);11        (3) the application of any pre-existing condition 12    exclusion under the plan, coverage, or policy; and13        (4) other activities related to the creation, renewal, 14    or replacement of a contract of health insurance or health 15    benefits. 16    "Underwriting purposes" does not include determinations of 17medical appropriateness where an individual seeks a benefit 18under the plan, coverage, or policy.19    This subsection (b) does not apply to insurers that are 20issuing a long-term care policy, excluding a nursing home 21fixed indemnity plan. 22    (c) An insurer may consider the results of genetic testing 23in connection with a policy of life insurance or policy of 24accident and health insurance if the individual voluntarily 25submits the results and the results are favorable to the 26individual.  HB2534- 3 -LRB104 08539 BAB 18591 b1    (d) An insurer that possesses information derived from 2genetic testing may not release the information to a third 3party, except as specified in this Act.4    (e) A company providing direct-to-consumer commercial 5genetic testing is prohibited from sharing any genetic test 6information or other personally identifiable information about 7a consumer with any health or life insurance company without 8written consent from the consumer. 9(Source: P.A. 101-132, eff. 1-1-20.) 10    Section 10. The Illinois Insurance Code is amended by 11adding Section 224.5 as follows: 12    (215 ILCS 5/224.5 new)13    Sec. 224.5. Use of information derived from genetic 14testing. After the effective date of this amendatory Act of 15the 104th General Assembly, an insurer must comply with the 16provisions of the Genetic Information Privacy Act in 17connection with the amendment, delivery, issuance, or renewal 18of a life insurance policy; claims for or denial of coverage 19under a life insurance policy; or the determination of 20premiums or rates under a life insurance policy.